Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1383.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Delinquent [act."(1) The term means an] act." An act designated a crime under the law of this Commonwealth, or of another state if 1234567891011121314151617181920 the act occurred in that state, or under Federal law, or an act which constitutes indirect criminal contempt under Chapter 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) with respect to sexual violence or 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) or the failure of a child to comply with a lawful sentence imposed for a summary offense, in which event notice of the fact shall be certified to the court.[(2) The term shall not include:(i) The crime of murder.(ii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and a deadly weapon as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions) was used during the commission of the offense which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(C) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(D) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(E) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).(F) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent 20250HB1383PN1752 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assault).(G) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).(H) Voluntary manslaughter.(I) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901 (relating to criminal attempt), 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) and 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy).(iii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and has been previously adjudicated delinquent of any of the following prohibited conduct which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121.(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123.(C) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii).(D) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702.(E) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125.(F) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901.(G) Voluntary manslaughter.(H) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901, 902 and 903.(iv) Summary offenses.(v) A crime committed by a child who has been found 20250HB1383PN1752 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guilty in a criminal proceeding for other than a summary offense.]* * *Section 2. Sections 6303(b), 6307(b)(1.1) and 6308(a) heading and introductory paragraph and (c)(1) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 6303. Scope of chapter.* * *(b) Minor judiciary.--No child shall be detained, committed or sentenced to imprisonment by a magisterial district judge or a judge of the minor judiciary [unless the child is charged with an act set forth in paragraph (2)(i), (ii), (iii) or (v) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 (relating to definitions)].* * *§ 6307. Inspection of court files and records.* * *(b) Public availability.--(1.1) The contents of court records and files concerning a child shall not be disclosed to the public. [unless any of the following apply:(i) The child has been adjudicated delinquent by a court as a result of an act or acts committed when the child was 14 years of age or older and the conduct would have constituted one or more of the following offenses if committed by an adult:(A) Murder.(B) Voluntary manslaughter.(C) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).20250HB1383PN1752 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Sexual Assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).(E) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(F) Arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a)(1) (relating to arson and related offenses).(G) Burglary as a felony in the first degree as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(c)(1) (relating to burglary).(H) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse.(I) Kidnapping.(J) Rape.(K) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(L) Robbery of motor vehicle.(M) Violation of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to firearms and other dangerous articles).(N) Attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses in this subparagraph.(ii) A petition alleging delinquency has been filed alleging that the child has committed an act or acts subject to a hearing pursuant to section 6336(e) (relating to conduct of hearings) and the child previously has been adjudicated delinquent by a court as a result of an act or acts committed when the child was 14 years of age or older and the conduct would have constituted one or more of the following offenses if committed by an adult:(A) Murder.20250HB1383PN1752 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Voluntary manslaughter.(C) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2).(D) Sexual Assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1.(E) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125.(F) Arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a)(1).(G) Burglary as a felony in the first degree as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(c)(1).(H) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse.(I) Kidnapping.(J) Rape.(K) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii).(L) Robbery of motor vehicle.(M) Violation of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61.(N) Attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses in this subparagraph.]* * *§ 6308. Law enforcement records.(a) [General rule] Inspection.--Law enforcement records and files concerning a child shall be kept separate from the records and files of arrests of adults. Unless [a charge of delinquency is transferred for criminal prosecution under section 6355 (relating to transfer to criminal proceedings),] the interest of national security requires[,] or the court otherwise orders in the interest of the child, the records and files shall not be open to public inspection or their contents disclosed to the public except as provided in subsection (b); but inspection of 20250HB1383PN1752 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the records and files is permitted by:* * *(c) Fingerprints and photographs.--(1) Law enforcement officers shall have the authority to take or cause to be taken the fingerprints or photographs, or both, of any child who is alleged to have committed an act designated as a misdemeanor or felony under the laws of this Commonwealth or of another state if the act occurred in that state or under Federal law. If a child is found to be a delinquent child pursuant to section 6341 (relating to adjudication) on the basis of an act designated as a misdemeanor or felony [or the child's case is transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 6355], the law enforcement agency that alleged the child to be a delinquent child shall take or cause to be taken the fingerprints and photographs of the child, if not previously taken pursuant to this case, and ensure that these records are forwarded to the central repository pursuant to section 6309(c) (relating to juvenile history record information). If a child was alleged to be delinquent by other than a law enforcement agency, the court shall direct the juvenile probation department to ensure that the delinquent child's fingerprints and photographs are taken by a law enforcement agency.* * *Section 3. Section 6322(a) of Title 42 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6322. Transfer from criminal proceedings.(a) [General rule] Transfer.--Except as provided in 75 Pa.C.S. § 6303 (relating to rights and liabilities of minors) or in the event the child [is charged with murder or any of the 20250HB1383PN1752 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offenses excluded by paragraph (2)(ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 (relating to definitions) or] has been found guilty in a criminal proceeding, if it appears to the court in a criminal proceeding that the defendant [is a child] was a child at the time of the offense, this chapter shall immediately become applicable, and the court shall forthwith halt further criminal proceedings, and, where appropriate, transfer the case to the division or a judge of the court assigned to conduct juvenile hearings, together with a copy of the accusatory pleading and other papers, documents, and transcripts of testimony relating to the case. [If it appears to the court in a criminal proceeding charging murder or any of the offenses excluded by paragraph (2)(ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302, that the defendant is a child, the case may similarly be transferred and the provisions of this chapter applied. In determining whether to transfer a case charging murder or any of the offenses excluded from the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302, the child shall be required to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the transfer will serve the public interest. In determining whether the child has so established that the transfer will serve the public interest, the court shall consider the factors contained in section 6355(a)(4)(iii) (relating to transfer to criminal proceedings).]* * *(f) Transfer of cases back to juvenile court.--In the case of an individual who was under 18 years of age at the time of the offense and whose case has already been transferred or is otherwise within the adult criminal justice system, the case shall be returned to juvenile court in accordance with 20250HB1383PN1752 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a).Section 4. Sections 6327(c), (c.1) and (d), 6336(e), 6337.1(b)(3)(ii) and 6339(a) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 6327. Place of detention.* * *(c) Detention in jail prohibited.--It is unlawful for any person in charge of or employed by a jail knowingly to receive for detention or to detain in the jail any person whom he has or should have reason to believe is a child. [unless, in a criminal proceeding, the child has been charged with or has been found guilty of an act set forth in paragraph (2)(i), (ii), (iii) or (v) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 (relating to definitions).(c.1) Detention of child.--(1) A child who is subject to criminal proceedings having been charged with an act set forth under paragraph (2)(i), (ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302, who has not been released on bail and who may seek or is seeking transfer to juvenile proceedings under section 6322 (relating to transfer from criminal proceedings) may be detained in a secure detention facility approved by the Department of Public Welfare for the detention of alleged and adjudicated delinquent children if the attorney for the Commonwealth has consented to and the court has ordered the detention.(2) Secure detention ordered under this subsection shall not affect a child's eligibility for or ability to post bail.(3) For a child held in secure detention under this subsection, the court shall order the immediate transfer of the child to the county jail if any of the following apply:20250HB1383PN1752 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The court determines that the child is no longer seeking transfer under section 6322.(ii) The court denies the motion filed under section 6322.(iii) The child attains 18 years of age. This subparagraph does not apply if:(A) the court has granted the motion filed under section 6322; or(B) the child is otherwise under order of commitment to the secure detention facility pursuant to the jurisdiction of the court in a delinquency matter.(d) Transfer of child subject to criminal proceedings.--If a case is transferred for criminal prosecution the child may be transferred to the appropriate officer or detention facility in accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime. The court in making the transfer may order continued detention as a juvenile pending trial if the child is unable to provide bail.]* * *§ 6336. Conduct of hearings.* * *[(e) Open proceedings.--The general public shall not be excluded from any hearings under this chapter:(1) Pursuant to a petition alleging delinquency where the child was 14 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and the alleged conduct would be considered a felony if committed by an adult.(2) Pursuant to a petition alleging delinquency where the child was 12 years of age or older at the time of the 20250HB1383PN1752 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alleged conduct and where the alleged conduct would have constituted one or more of the following offenses if committed by an adult:(i) Murder.(ii) Voluntary manslaughter.(iii) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(iv) Arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a)(1) (relating to arson and related offenses).(v) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse.(vi) Kidnapping.(vii) Rape.(viii) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(ix) Robbery of motor vehicle.(x) Attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses in this paragraph.Notwithstanding anything in this subsection, the proceedings shall be closed upon and to the extent of any agreement between the child and the attorney for the Commonwealth.]* * *§ 6337.1. Right to counsel for children in dependency and delinquency proceedings.* * *(b) Children in delinquency proceedings.--* * *(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a child who is 14 years of age or older may waive the right to counsel if the court has determined that the waiver is knowingly, intelligently and voluntarily made after having conducted a 20250HB1383PN1752 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 colloquy with the child on the record, in accordance with the Pennsylvania Rules of Juvenile Court Procedure, and the hearing for which waiver is sought is not one of the following:* * *[(ii) A hearing to consider transfer to criminal proceedings under section 6355 (relating to transfer to criminal proceedings).]* * *§ 6339. Investigation and report.(a) [General rule] Authorization.--If the allegations of a petition are admitted by a party [or notice of hearing under section 6355 (relating to transfer to criminal proceedings) has been given], the court, prior to the hearing on need for treatment or disposition, may direct that a social study and report in writing to the court be made by an officer of the court or other person designated by the court, concerning the child, his family, his environment, and other matters relevant to disposition of the case. If the allegations of the petition are not admitted [and notice of a hearing under section 6355 has not been given], the court shall not direct the making of the study and report until after the court has held a hearing on the petition upon notice of hearing given pursuant to this chapter and the court has found that the child committed a delinquent act or is a dependent child.* * *Section 5. Section 6355 of Title 42 is repealed:[§ 6355. Transfer to criminal proceedings.(a) General rule.--After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency based on conduct which is designated a crime or 20250HB1383PN1752 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public offense under the laws, including local ordinances, of this Commonwealth, the court before hearing the petition on its merits may rule that this chapter is not applicable and that the offense should be prosecuted, and transfer the offense, where appropriate, to the division or a judge of the court assigned to conduct criminal proceedings, for prosecution of the offense if all of the following exist:(1) The child was 14 or more years of age at the time of the alleged conduct.(2) A hearing on whether the transfer should be made is held in conformity with this chapter.(3) Notice in writing of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing is given to the child and his parents, guardian, or other custodian at least three days before the hearing.(4) The court finds:(i) that there is a prima facie case that the child committed the delinquent act alleged;(ii) that the delinquent act would be considered a felony if committed by an adult;(iii) that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the public interest is served by the transfer of the case for criminal prosecution. In determining whether the public interest can be served, the court shall consider the following factors:(A) the impact of the offense on the victim or victims;(B) the impact of the offense on the community;(C) the threat to the safety of the public or any individual posed by the child;(D) the nature and circumstances of the offense 20250HB1383PN1752 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 allegedly committed by the child;(E) the degree of the child's culpability;(F) the adequacy and duration of dispositional alternatives available under this chapter and in the adult criminal justice system; and(G) whether the child is amenable to treatment, supervision or rehabilitation as a juvenile by considering the following factors:(I) age;(II) mental capacity;(III) maturity;(IV) the degree of criminal sophistication exhibited by the child;(V) previous records, if any;(VI) the nature and extent of any prior delinquent history, including the success or failure of any previous attempts by the juvenile court to rehabilitate the child;(VII) whether the child can be rehabilitated prior to the expiration of the juvenile court jurisdiction;(VIII) probation or institutional reports, if any;(IX) any other relevant factors; and(iv) that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the child is not committable to an institution for the mentally retarded or mentally ill.(b) Chapter inapplicable following transfer.--The transfer terminates the applicability of this chapter over the child with respect to the delinquent acts alleged in the petition.20250HB1383PN1752 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Transfer at request of child.--The child may request that the case be transferred for prosecution in which event the court may order this chapter not applicable.(d) Effect of transfer from criminal proceedings.--No hearing shall be conducted where this chapter becomes applicable because of a previous determination by the court in a criminal proceeding.(e) Murder and other excluded acts.--Where the petition alleges conduct which if proven would constitute murder, or any of the offenses excluded by paragraph (2)(ii) or (iii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 (relating to definitions), the court shall require the offense to be prosecuted under the criminal law and procedures, except where the case has been transferred pursuant to section 6322 (relating to transfer from criminal proceedings) from the division or a judge of the court assigned to conduct criminal proceedings.(f) Transfer action interlocutory.--The decision of the court to transfer or not to transfer the case shall be interlocutory.(g) Burden of proof.--The burden of establishing by a preponderance of evidence that the public interest is served by the transfer of the case to criminal court and that a child is not amenable to treatment, supervision or rehabilitation as a juvenile shall rest with the Commonwealth unless the following apply:(1) (i) a deadly weapon as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions) was used and the child was 14 years of age at the time of the offense; or(ii) the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the offense and was previously adjudicated 20250HB1383PN1752 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delinquent of a crime that would be considered a felony if committed by an adult; and(2) there is a prima facie case that the child committed a delinquent act which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery), robbery of motor vehicle, aggravated indecent assault, kidnapping, voluntary manslaughter, an attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any of these crimes or an attempt to commit murder as specified in paragraph (2)(ii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302.If either of the preceding criteria are met, the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that retaining the case under this chapter serves the public interest and that the child is amenable to treatment, supervision or rehabilitation as a juvenile shall rest with the child.]Section 6. This act shall apply to all proceedings that commence on or after the effective date of this section.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1383PN1752 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021